Tennessee, session 114, SB0239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
(a) The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR)
shall study:
(1) The current availability of local juvenile detention centers and other
facilities for the housing and treatment of juveniles detained prior to an
adjudicatory hearing, and whether there is a need for additional local juvenile
detention centers or other facilities for the housing and treatment of juvenile
offenders detained prior to an adjudicatory hearing; and
(2) The current availability of housing and other treatment facilities for
juvenile offenders who have been adjudicated delinquent and committed to the
custody of the department of children's services, and whether there is a need for
additional housing or other treatment facilities for those juvenile offenders.
(b) TACIR may request information and input from the department of children's
services and other appropriate state and local governmental entities, as necessary, and
such an entity shall comply with TACIR's request. The study must be conducted from
TACIR's existing resources.
(c) On or before January 1, 2026, TACIR shall report its findings and
recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to each member of the general
SB0239
000117
- 1 -

assembly and shall provide a copy to the legislative librarian. The report may be
delivered electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000117